Utah statutes.
22-3-404.   Receipts not normally apportioned -- Principal receipts.

A trustee shall allocate to principal:

(1)  to the extent not allocated to income under this chapter, assets received from a transferor during the transferor's lifetime, a decedent's estate, a trust with a terminating income interest, or a payer under a contract naming the trust or its trustee as beneficiary;

(2)  money or other property received from the sale, exchange, liquidation, or change in form of a principal asset, including realized profit, subject to this part;

(3)  amounts recovered from third parties to reimburse the trust because of disbursements described in Subsection 22-3-502(1)(g) or for other reasons to the extent not based on the loss of income;

(4)  proceeds of property taken by eminent domain, but a separate award made for the loss of income with respect to an accounting period during which a current income beneficiary had a mandatory income interest is income;

(5)  net income received in an accounting period during which there is no beneficiary to whom a trustee may or must distribute income; and

(6)  other receipts as provided in Sections 22-3-408 through 22-3-415.

